Utah statutes.
32A-1-601 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Title -- Purpose -- Application to other
laws.
(1)  This part is known as the "Attire, Conduct, and Entertainment Act."
(2)  This part establishes reasonable and uniform time, place, and manner of
operation restrictions relating to attire, conduct, and sexually oriented
entertainers on a premises or at an event at which alcoholic beverages are
sold, served, or allowed to be consumed under a retail license or permit
issued by the commission so as to:
(a)  reduce the adverse secondary effects that the attire, conduct, and
sexually oriented entertainers may have upon communities of this state; and
(b)  protect the health, peace, safety, welfare, and morals of the residents
of communities of this state.
(3)  Nothing in this part permits or allows the showing or display of any
matter that is contrary to:
(a)  applicable federal or state statutes prohibiting obscenity; or
(b)  state statutes relating to lewdness or indecent public displays.
(4)  A local authority may be more restrictive of attire, conduct, or sexually
oriented entertainers of the type prohibited in this part.
